dictionaries/cy_GB.dic
enweiri/DMNQ
hacti/DNQ
wichi/DMNQ
cydi/DLNQ
reweiddi/DNQ
plaeni/DLNQ
rosti/DNQ
pwffi/DLNQ
dreuli/DNQ
feincnodi/ADNQ
wawchi/DMNQ
glipi/DNQ
clwci/DLNQ
lastwreiddi/DNQ
nyrsi/DNQ
cyti/DLNQ
rhochi/ADNQ
ailgynigi/DNPQ
sgwri/DNQ
llurguni/DNQ
apwynti/DNPQ
ddeisyfi/ADNQ
staeni/DNQ
ymliwi/DNQ
diwbi/DNQ
luddi/DNQ
e-bosti/DNQ
clunheci/DLNQ
ddadwreiddi/DNQ
arnofi/DNPQ
ddrili/DNQ
carboneiddi/DLNQ
gyfatali/DNQ
ddripi/DNQ
ddadweini/DNQ
cychi/ADLNQ
leinasi/DNQ
gontracti/DNQ
adleoli/DNQ
baffi/DNQ
fecaneiddi/DNQ
beici/DNQ
lyffetheiri/DNQ
pinbwynti/DLNQ
or-hawli/DMNQ
cawli/DLNQ
gelci/ADNQ
farneisi/DNQ
gosti/DNQ
cnydi/DLNQ
llafuri/DNQ
bugeili/DNQ
flodi/DNQ
cyrni/DLNQ
reoleiddi/DNQ
ddad-ddyfri/DNQ
ailddiwygi/DNPQ
ergydi/DNQ
dwdli/DNQ
sancteiddi/DNQ
rholi/DNQ
hymlidi/DNQ
tapi/ADLNQ
taro/ADLN
gwyso/DNQ
preswyli/DLNQ
ffulli/DNQ
ddisgrifi/DNQ
drosdeipi/DNQ
ailgyfeiri/DNPQ
stwnsi/DNQ
ymguri/DNQ
oeli/DMNQ
atgofi/DNPQ
ragdybi/DNQ
ragrithi/DNQ
drawsnewidi/DNQ
ragddyddi/DNQ
cylchi/ADLNQ
bôn-doci/DNQ
ysglefri/DNQ
trawsffurfi/DLNQ
dadorchuddi/DNQ
ymgynghreiri/DNQ
ddadwraiddi/DNQ
drabi/DNQ
banti/DNQ
fochi/DNQ
glunheci/DNQ
epili/DNQ
clatsi/DLNQ
hecsbloeti/DNQ
swni/DNQ
sadi/DNQ
ddienyddi/ADNQ
gylchi/ADNQ
anobeithi/DNPQ
gigyddi/DNQ
ben-glini/DNQ
ddienaidi/DNQ
tiri/DLNQ
herfeiddi/DNQ
bedyddi/DNQ
forteisi/DNQ
celci/ADLNQ
gyfeili/DNQ
gigweini/DNQ
gydfonitori/DNQ
diffeithi/DNQ
glatsi/DNQ
anifeileiddi/DNPQ
draeni/DNQ
rhawi/DNQ
panti/DLNQ
hochneidi/DNQ
tremi/ADLNQ
glewti/DNQ
ireiddi/DNQ
difreini/DNQ
bloti/DNQ
meddyli/DNQ
ailbaci/DNPQ
sbeiti/DNQ
hwri/DNQ
ffafri/DNQ
eneini/DNQ
goci/DN
godi/DN
estroneiddi/DNQ
ridylli/ADNQ
bradlofruddi/DNQ
puteini/DLNQ
raddi/DNQ
hysloti/DNQ
myrni/DNQ
broffidi/DNQ
gyfeirnodi/ADNQ
sili/DNQ
safni/DNQ
coedi/DLNQ
brwyli/DNQ
finimeiddi/DNQ
trafaelo/DLNQ
seili/DNQ
seini/DNQ
henamlo/DNQ
llechi/ADN
hymlafni/DNQ
ddarnguddi/DNQ
ymgomi/DNQ
afaeli/DMNQ
cyfliwi/DLNQ
barnaisi/DNQ
cleisi/DLNQ
graci/DNQ
grwpi/DNQ
bwysleisi/DNQ
hici/DNQ
labyddi/DNQ
gyffi/DNQ
hymgreini/DNQ
fugeili/DNQ
insiwleiddi/DNQ
ysgrydi/DNQ
feichi/DNQ
dadrithi/DNQ
heinti/DNQ
morthwyli/DNQ
cadeiri/DLNQ
piffi/DLNQ
canfasi/DLNQ
fosti/DNQ
foli/DN
adlini/DNPQ
breisgi/DNQ
dameidi/DNQ
begi/DNQ
wepi/DMNQ
foti/DNQ
dreisi/DNQ
heigi/DNQ
crafangi/ADLNQ
treiddi/DLNQ
beti/DNQ
friwli/ADNQ
llawci/DNQ
blici/DNQ
hymbinci/DNQ
poti/DLNQ
boenydi/DNQ
pinci/DLNQ
harthi/DNQ
anturi/DNPQ
ddiraddi/DNQ
raeni/ADNQ
boddi/ADNQ
tosturi/DLN
ymwthi/DNQ
beiddi/DNQT
encili/DNQ
gleci/DN
pinsi/DLNQ
gyweini/DNQ
ddoli/DN
cylcharweini/DLNQ
fedyddi/DNQ
marweiddi/DNQ
smali/DNQ
galci/DNQ
damni/DNQ
sgrwbi/DNQ
symi/DNQ
brudi/DNQ
athreiddi/DNPQ
sypi/DNQ
mylli/ADNQ
fwri/DNQ
crygleisi/DLNQ
follti/DNQ
winci/DNQ
arallgyfeiri/DNPQ
tysti/DLNQ
feiddi/DNQ
diffygi/DNQ
moelo/DNQ
datsaili/DNQ
alltudi/DNPQ
sgrapi/DNQ
drwgdybi/DNQ
ffieiddi/DNQ
hymgynghreiri/DNQ
rhagddyddi/DNQ
efeili/DMNQ
graeni/ADNQ
cyniweiri/DLNQ
podsoleiddi/DLNQ
defnyddi/DNQ
clerci/DLNQ
fflati/DNQ
dadgodi/DNQ
crewti/DLNQ
hefrydi/ADNQ
dadocsideiddi/DNQ
cywreini/DLNQ
ailafaeli/DNPQ
dobi/DNQ
hestroneiddi/DNQ
trosdeipi/DLNQ
ddali/ADNQ
hymegni/DNQ
hencili/DNQ
doli/ADN
dyfeisi/DNQ
danseili/DNQ
herlidi/DNQ
farbi/DNQ
cnuli/DLNQ
fisi/DN
gyseini/DNQ
ail-listi/DNPQ
reiddi/DMNQ
nogi/DNQ
blyci/DNQ
copideipi/DLNQ
reibi/DNQ
cwesti/DLNQ
clepi/DLNQ
sgriwi/DNQ
calli/DLNQ
disbeini/DNQ
ludo/DNQ
chwinci/DNQ
blysi/ADNQ
enghreiffti/DNQ
ganfasi/DNQ
hymgili/DNQ
gydgordi/DNQ
gnoci/DNQ
lliwi/DNQ
gydi/DNQ
dwbi/DNQ
rhagrithi/DNQ
fragi/ADNQ
cysefeilli/DLNQ
coci/DLN
plyci/DLNQ
pibyddi/DLNQ
gyni/DN
ddadocsideiddi/DNQ
iengeiddi/DNQ
broci/DNQ
dditi/DNQ
plymi/DLNQ
dwti/DN
fforchi/ADNQ
greini/DNQ
gafni/ADNQ
bownsi/DNQ
llarieiddi/DNQ
wareiddi/DMNQ
darlithi/DNQ
daro/ADN
gydffurfi/DNQ
fownsi/DNQ
cydweithi/DLNQ
gynhigi/DNQ
bygythi/DNQ
mori/DNQ
barbi/DNQ
isgili/DNQ
polareiddi/DLNQ
chwifi/DNQ
ymrafaeli/DNQ
hysbeili/DNQ
ddatsaili/DNQ
crydi/ADLNQ
cystuddi/DLNQ
fasgi/DNQ
ddrwgdybi/DNQ
ailhongi/DNPQ
minimeiddi/DNQ
smwddi/DNQ
diheinti/DNQ
dremi/ADNQ
ddefnyddi/DNQ
ddrylli/DNQ
gydgydi/DNQ
glastwreiddi/DNQ
dresi/DN
gelffeini/DNQ
modiwlareiddi/DNQ
gondemni/DNQ
cofleidi/DLNQ
bragi/ADNQ
sero/DN
stompi/DNQ
brwysgi/DN
fatriciwleiddi/DNQ
lafuri/DNQ
gneifi/DNQ
rheibi/DNQ
ddwrdi/DNQ
arweini/DNPQ
trimi/DLNQ
cynigo/DLNQ
fforddi/DNQ
ddadbaci/DNQ
gynigo/DNQ
gloci/DNQ
lori/DN
ffati/DNQ
stranci/DNQ
mapi/DNQ
ddisbeini/DNQ
hepi/DNQ
nithi/DMNQ
byndi/DNQ
hysbi/DNQ
ragnodi/ADNQ
democrateiddi/DNQ
wagi/ADMNQ
fagneteiddi/DNQ
pwlpi/DLNQ
barbareiddi/DNQ
hwyli/ADNQ
feindi/DNQ
brotesti/DNQ
pen-glini/DLNQ
drylli/DNQ
lachi/DNQ
maeli/DNQ
adfewni/DNQ
dad-ddyfri/DNQ
canoneiddi/DLNQ
stici/DNQ
brisi/DNQ
bagi/DNQ
drawsgyfeiri/DNQ
cyd-deithi/DLNQ
hidroleiddi/DNQ
dadweini/DNQ
bledi/DNQ
ailraddi/DNPQ
bari/DNQ
forgeisi/DNQ
ffini/DNQ
laci/DNQ
wrthneidi/DMNQ
creiddi/DLNQ
ewtroffeiddi/DNQ
dadwraiddi/DNQ
rhidylli/ADNQ
driffti/DNQ
grychi/ADNQ
pynci/DLNQ
fowli/DNQ
wibi/DMNQ
henghreiffti/DNQ
hoeli/DNQ
geci/DNQ
pasti/DLNQ
daili/DNQ
bici/DNQ
berffeithi/DNQ
orweddi/ADMNQ
gamddefnyddi/DNQ
grawni/ADNQ
ddympi/DNQ
ffurfi/DNQ
areithi/DNPQ
fframi/DNQ
rhusi/DNQ
sgori/DNQ
bwffi/DNQ
ddrabi/DNQ
pleti/DLNQ
wynti/DMNQ
baeti/DNQ
ordeini/DNQ
mwyngloddi/DNQ
walci/DMNQ
dolci/DNQ
pwmpi/DLNQ
aneli/DNPQ
ganoneiddi/DNQ
trawsgyfeiri/DLNQ
gyrni/DNQ
ailymafaelo/DNPQ
